Ohio, session 136, SB215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 323.152 and 4503.065 of the 4
Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 323.152. In addition to the reduction in taxes 6
required under section 319.302 of the Revised Code, taxes shall 7
be reduced as provided in divisions (A) and (B) of this section. 8
(A)(1)(a) Division (A)(1) of this section applies to any 9
of the following persons: 10
(i) A person who is permanently and totally disabled; 11
(ii) A person who is sixty-five years of age or older; 12
(iii) A person who is the surviving spouse of a deceased 13
person who was permanently and totally disabled or sixty-five 14
years of age or older and who applied and qualified for a 15
reduction in taxes under this division in the year of death, 16
provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine but not 17
sixty-five or more years of age on the date the deceased spouse 18
dies. 19

S. B. No. 215 Page 2
As Introduced
(b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 20
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a person to 21
whom division (A)(1) of this section applies shall be reduced 22
for each year for which an application for the reduction has 23
been approved. The reduction shall equal one of the following 24
amounts, as applicable to the person: 25
(i) If the person received a reduction under division (A) 26
(1) of this section for tax year 2006, the greater of the 27
reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under 28
division (A)(1)(c) of this section; 29
(ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a 30
reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 31
2013 or under division (A) of section 4503.065 of the Revised 32
Code for tax year 2014 or the person is the surviving spouse of 33
such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine 34
years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount 35
computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. 36
(iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(1)(b) 37
(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does 38
not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division 39
(A)(1)(d) of this sectionthe ninetieth percentile of household 40
modified adjusted gross income of all Ohio residents, the amount 41
computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. 42
(c) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(1)(c) 43
of this section equals the product of the following: 44
(i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the true A percentage 45
of the taxable value of the property in money, based on the 46
applicant's total income percentile relative to the household 47
modified adjusted gross income of all Ohio residents as adjusted 48

S. B. No. 215 Page 3
As Introduced
under division (A)(1)(d) of this section; provided in the 49
following table: 50
51
1 2
A Total Income Percentile Exemption Percentage
B At or below 50% 20%
C Greater than 50% and at or below 60% 16%
D Greater than 60% and at or below 70% 12%
E Greater than 70% and at or below 80% 8%
F Greater than 80% and at or below 90% 4%
(ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax 52
commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the 53
Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; 54
(iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes 55
charged against the property for the current year, where 56
"effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the 57
Revised Code; 58
(iv)(iii) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the 59
percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the 60
current tax year under section 319.302 of the Revised Code and 61
division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. 62
(d) The tax commissioner shall adjust the total income 63
threshold described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) and the reduction 64
amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(i), (A)(2), and (A)(3) 65
of this section by completing the following calculations in 66

S. B. No. 215 Page 4
As Introduced
September of each year: 67
(i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 68
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 69
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 70
first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last 71
day of December of the preceding calendar year; 72
(ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income 73
threshold or reduction amount for the current tax year, as 74
applicable; 75
(iii) Add the resulting product to the total income 76
threshold or the reduction amount, as applicable, for the 77
current tax year; 78
(iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of 79
one hundred dollars. 80
The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from 81
each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first 82
day of December each year. The certified total income threshold 83
amount applies to the following tax year for persons described 84
in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. The certified 85
reduction amount applies to the following tax year. The 86
commissioner shall not make the applicable adjustment in any 87
calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment 88
would be less than the total income threshold or the reduction 89
amount for the current tax year. 90
(2)(a) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and 91
occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a 92
disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year for which an 93
application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction 94
shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty one 95

S. B. No. 215 Page 5
As Introduced
hundred four thousand six hundred dollars of the true value of 96
the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d)(A) 97
(2)(c) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions 98
(A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv)and (iii) of this section and further 99
multiplied by the assessment percentage established by the tax 100
commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the 101
Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent. The reduction 102
is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised 103
Code or division (A)(1), (2)(b), or (3) of this section. The 104
reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by a 105
disabled veteran. 106
(b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 107
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the 108
surviving spouse of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each 109
year an application for exemption is approved. The reduction 110
shall equal to the amount of the reduction authorized under 111
division (A)(2)(a) of this section. 112
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 113
323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(a), or (3) 114
of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead 115
owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled 116
veteran. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under 117
division (A)(2)(b) of this section beginning in one of the 118
following tax years: 119
(i) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(1) of 120
section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled 121
veteran dies; 122
(ii) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(2) 123
of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the first year on the 124
first day of January of which the total disability rating 125

S. B. No. 215 Page 6
As Introduced
described in division (F) of that section has been received for 126
the deceased spouse. 127
In either case, the reduction shall continue through the 128
tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. 129
(c) The tax commissioner shall adjust the reduction 130
amounts described in divisions (A)(2) and (A)(3) of this section 131
by completing the following calculations in September of each 132
year: 133
(i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 134
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 135
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 136
first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last 137
day of December of the preceding calendar year; 138
(ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the reduction 139
amount for the current tax year; 140
(iii) Add the resulting product to the reduction amount 141
for the current tax year; 142
(iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of 143
one hundred dollars. 144
The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from 145
each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first 146
day of December each year. The certified reduction amount 147
applies to the following tax year. The commissioner shall not 148
make the applicable adjustment in any calendar year in which the 149
amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the 150
reduction amount for the current tax year. 151
(3) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 152
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the 153

S. B. No. 215 Page 7
As Introduced
surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line 154
of duty shall be reduced for each year for which an application 155
for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal 156
the product obtained by multiplying fifty one hundred four 157
thousand six hundred dollars of the true value of the property 158
in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d)(A)(2)(c) of this 159
section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to 160
(iv)and (iii) of this section and further multiplied by the 161
assessment percentage established by the tax commissioner under 162
division (B) of section 5715.01 of the Revised Code, not to 163
exceed thirty-five per cent. The reduction is in lieu of any 164
reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division 165
(A)(1) or (2) of this section. The reduction applies to only one 166
homestead owned and occupied by such a surviving spouse. A 167
homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under division (A) 168
(3) of this section for the tax year in which the public service 169
officer dies through the tax year in which the surviving spouse 170
dies or remarries. 171
(B) To provide a partial exemption, real property taxes on 172
any homestead, and manufactured home taxes on any manufactured 173
or mobile home on which a manufactured home tax is assessed 174
pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised 175
Code, shall be reduced for each year for which an application 176
for the reduction has been approved. The amount of the reduction 177
shall equal two and one-half per cent of the amount of taxes to 178
be levied by qualifying levies on the homestead or the 179
manufactured or mobile home after applying section 319.301 of 180
the Revised Code. For the purposes of this division, "qualifying 181
levy" has the same meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised 182
Code. 183
(C) The reductions granted by this section do not apply to 184

S. B. No. 215 Page 8
As Introduced
special assessments or respread of assessments levied against 185
the homestead, and if there is a transfer of ownership 186
subsequent to the filing of an application for a reduction in 187
taxes, such reductions are not forfeited for such year by virtue 188
of such transfer. 189
(D) The reductions in taxable value referred to in this 190
section shall be applied solely as a factor for the purpose of 191
computing the reduction of taxes under this section and shall 192
not affect the total value of property in any subdivision or 193
taxing district as listed and assessed for taxation on the tax 194
lists and duplicates, or any direct or indirect limitations on 195
indebtedness of a subdivision or taxing district. If after 196
application of sections 5705.31 and 5705.32 of the Revised Code, 197
including the allocation of all levies within the ten-mill 198
limitation to debt charges to the extent therein provided, there 199
would be insufficient funds for payment of debt charges not 200
provided for by levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation, the 201
reduction of taxes provided for in sections 323.151 to 323.159 202
of the Revised Code shall be proportionately adjusted to the 203
extent necessary to provide such funds from levies within the 204
ten-mill limitation. 205
(E) No reduction shall be made on the taxes due on the 206
homestead of any person convicted of violating division (D) or 207
(E) of section 323.153 of the Revised Code for a period of three 208
years following the conviction. 209
Sec. 4503.065. (A)(1) Division (A) of this section applies 210
to any of the following persons: 211
(a) An individual who is permanently and totally disabled; 212
(b) An individual who is sixty-five years of age or older; 213

S. B. No. 215 Page 9
As Introduced
(c) An individual who is the surviving spouse of a 214
deceased person who was permanently and totally disabled or 215
sixty-five years of age or older and who applied and qualified 216
for a reduction in assessable value under this section in the 217
year of death, provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty- 218
nine but not sixty-five or more years of age on the date the 219
deceased spouse dies. 220
(2) The manufactured home tax on a manufactured or mobile 221
home that is paid pursuant to division (C) of section 4503.06 of 222
the Revised Code and that is owned and occupied as a home by an 223
individual whose domicile is in this state and to whom this 224
section applies, shall be reduced for any tax year for which an 225
application for such reduction has been approved, provided the 226
individual did not acquire ownership from a person, other than 227
the individual's spouse, related by consanguinity or affinity 228
for the purpose of qualifying for the reduction. An owner 229
includes a settlor of a revocable or irrevocable inter vivos 230
trust holding the title to a manufactured or mobile home 231
occupied by the settlor as of right under the trust. 232
(a) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax 233
imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under 234
division (D)(2) of that section, the reduction shall equal one 235
of the following amounts, as applicable to the person: 236
(i) If the person received a reduction under this section 237
for tax year 2007, the greater of the reduction for that tax 238
year or the amount computed under division (A)(2)(b) of this 239
section; 240
(ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a 241
reduction under division (A) of this section for tax year 2014 242
or under division (A)(1) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code 243

S. B. No. 215 Page 10
As Introduced
for tax year 2013 or the person is the surviving spouse of such 244
a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine years 245
of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount computed 246
under division (A)(2)(b) of this section. 247
(iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(2)(a) 248
(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does 249
not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division 250
(A)(2)(e) of this sectionthe ninetieth percentile of household 251
modified adjusted gross income of all Ohio residents, the amount 252
computed under division (A)(2)(b) of this section. 253
(b) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(2)(b) 254
of this section equals the product of the following: 255
(i) Twenty-five thousand dollars A percentage of the true 256
taxable value of the property in money, based on the applicant's 257
total income percentile relative to the household modified 258
adjusted gross income of all Ohio residents as adjusted under 259
division (A)(2)(e) of this section; provided in the following 260
table: 261
262
1 2
A Total Income Percentile Exemption Percentage
B At or below 50% 20%
C Greater than 50% and at or below 60% 16%
D Greater than 60% and at or below 70% 12%
E Greater than 70% and at or below 80% 8%
F Greater than 80% and at or below 90% 4%

S. B. No. 215 Page 11
As Introduced
(ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax 263
commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the 264
Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; 265
(iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes 266
charged against the property for the current year, where 267
"effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the 268
Revised Code; 269
(iv)(iii) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the 270
percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the 271
current tax year under section 319.302 of the Revised Code and 272
division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. 273
(c) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax 274
imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under 275
division (D)(1) of that section, the reduction shall equal one 276
of the following amounts, as applicable to the person: 277
(i) If the person received a reduction under this section 278
for tax year 2007, the greater of the reduction for that tax 279
year or the amount computed under division (A)(2)(d) of this 280
section; 281
(ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a 282
reduction under division (A) of this section for tax year 2014 283
or under division (A)(1) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code 284
for tax year 2013 or the person is the surviving spouse of such 285
a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine years 286
of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount computed 287
under division (A)(2)(d) of this section. 288
(iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(2)(c) 289
(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does 290
not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division 291

S. B. No. 215 Page 12
As Introduced
(A)(2)(e) of this sectionthe ninetieth percentile of modified 292
adjusted gross income of all Ohio residents, the amount computed 293
under division (A)(2)(d) of this section. 294
(d) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(2)(d) 295
of this section equals the product of the following: 296
(i) Twenty-five thousand dollarsA percentage of the cost 297
to the owner, or the market value at the time of purchase, 298
whichever is greater, as those terms are used in division (D)(1) 299
of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, and as adjusted under 300
division (A)(2)(e) of this section; based on the applicant's 301
total income percentile relative to the household modified 302
adjusted gross income of all Ohio residents as provided in the 303
following table: 304
305
1 2
A Total Income Percentile Exemption Percentage
B At or below 50% 20%
C Greater than 50% and at or below 60% 16%
D Greater than 60% and at or below 70% 12%
E Greater than 70% and at or below 80% 8%
F Greater than 80% and at or below 90% 4%
(ii) The percentage from the appropriate schedule in 306
division (D)(1)(b) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code; 307
(iii) The assessment percentage of forty per cent used in 308
division (D)(1)(b) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code; 309

S. B. No. 215 Page 13
As Introduced
(iv) The tax rate of the taxing district in which the home 310
has its situs. 311
(e) The tax commissioner shall adjust the income threshold 312
described in divisions (A)(2)(a)(iii) and (A)(2)(c)(iii) and the 313
reduction amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(b)(i), (A)(2)(d) 314
(i), (B)(1), (B)(2), (C)(1), and (C)(2) of this section by 315
completing the following calculations in September of each year: 316
(i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 317
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 318
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 319
first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last 320
day of December of the preceding calendar year; 321
(ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income 322
threshold or reduction amount for the ensuing tax year, as 323
applicable; 324
(iii) Add the resulting product to the total income 325
threshold or reduction amount, as applicable for the ensuing tax 326
year; 327
(iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of 328
one hundred dollars. 329
The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from 330
each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first 331
day of December each year. The certified amount applies to the 332
second ensuing tax year. The commissioner shall not make the 333
applicable adjustment in any calendar year in which the amount 334
resulting from the adjustment would be less than the total 335
income threshold or the reduction amount for the ensuing tax 336
year. 337
(B)(1) The manufactured home tax levied pursuant to 338

S. B. No. 215 Page 14
As Introduced
division (C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on a 339
manufactured or mobile home that is owned and occupied by a 340
disabled veteran shall be reduced for any tax year for which an 341
application for such reduction has been approved, provided the 342
disabled veteran did not acquire ownership from a person, other 343
than the disabled veteran's spouse, related by consanguinity or 344
affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the reduction. An 345
owner includes an owner within the meaning of division (A)(2) of 346
this section. 347
(a) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax 348
imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under 349
division (D)(2) of that section, the reduction shall equal the 350
product obtained by multiplying fifty one hundred four thousand 351
six hundred dollars of the true value of the property in money, 352
as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e)(B)(3) of this section, by 353
the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(b)(ii) to (iv)and 354
(iii) of this section and further multiplied by the assessment 355
percentage established by the tax commissioner under division 356
(B) of section 5715.01 of the Revised Code, not to exceed 357
thirty-five per cent. 358
(b) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax 359
imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under 360
division (D)(1) of that section, the reduction shall equal the 361
product obtained by multiplying fifty one hundred four thousand 362
six hundred dollars of the cost to the owner, or the market 363
value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, as those 364
terms are used in division (D)(1) of section 4503.06 of the 365
Revised Code, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e)(B)(3) of this 366
section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(d)(ii) to 367
(iv) of this section. 368

S. B. No. 215 Page 15
As Introduced
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 369
4503.0610 of the Revised Code or division (A), (B)(2), or (C) of 370
this section. The reduction applies to only one manufactured or 371
mobile home owned and occupied by a disabled veteran. 372
(2) The manufactured home tax levied pursuant to division 373
(C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on a manufactured or 374
mobile home that is owned and occupied by the surviving spouse 375
of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each tax year for 376
which an application for such reduction has been approved. The 377
reduction shall equal the amount of the reduction authorized 378
under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. 379
An owner includes an owner within the meaning of division (A)(2) 380
of this section. 381
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 382
4503.0610 of the Revised Code or division (A), (B)(1), or (C) of 383
this section. The reduction applies to only one manufactured or 384
mobile home owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a 385
disabled veteran. A manufactured or mobile home qualifies for a 386
reduction in taxes under division (B)(2) of this section 387
beginning in one of the following tax years: 388
(a) For a surviving spouse described in division (H)(1) of 389
section 4503.064 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled 390
veteran dies; 391
(b) For a surviving spouse described in division (H)(2) of 392
section 4503.064 of the Revised Code, the first year on the 393
first day of January of which the total disability rating 394
described in division (F) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code 395
has been received for the deceased spouse. 396
In either case, the reduction shall continue through the 397

S. B. No. 215 Page 16
As Introduced
tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. 398
(3) The tax commissioner shall adjust the reduction 399
amounts described in divisions (B)(1), (B)(2), (C)(1), and (C) 400
(2) of this section by completing the following calculations in 401
September of each year: 402
(a) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 403
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 404
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 405
first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last 406
day of December of the preceding calendar year; 407
(b) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income 408
threshold or reduction amount for the ensuing tax year, as 409
applicable; 410
(c) Add the resulting product to the total income 411
threshold or reduction amount, as applicable, for the ensuing 412
tax year; 413
(d) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of one 414
hundred dollars. 415
The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from 416
each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first 417
day of December each year. The certified amount applies to the 418
second ensuing tax year. The commissioner shall not make the 419
applicable adjustment in any calendar year in which the amount 420
resulting from the adjustment would be less than the total 421
income threshold or the reduction amount for the ensuing tax 422
year. 423
(C) The manufactured home tax levied pursuant to division 424
(C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on a manufactured or 425
mobile home that is owned and occupied by the surviving spouse 426

S. B. No. 215 Page 17
As Introduced
of a public service officer killed in the line of duty shall be 427
reduced for any tax year for which an application for such 428
reduction has been approved, provided the surviving spouse did 429
not acquire ownership from a person, other than the surviving 430
spouse's deceased public service officer spouse, related by 431
consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the 432
reduction. An owner includes an owner within the meaning of 433
division (A)(2) of this section. 434
(1) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax 435
imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under 436
division (D)(2) of that section, the reduction shall equal the 437
product obtained by multiplying fifty one hundred four thousand 438
six hundred dollars of the true value of the property in money, 439
as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e)(B)(3) of this section, by 440
the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(b)(ii) to (iv)and 441
(iii) of this section and further multiplied by the assessment 442
percentage established by the tax commissioner under division 443
(B) of section 5715.01 of the Revised Code, not to exceed 444
thirty-five per cent. 445
(2) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax 446
imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under 447
division (D)(1) of that section, the reduction shall equal the 448
product obtained by multiplying fifty one hundred four thousand 449
six hundred dollars of the cost to the owner, or the market 450
value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, as those 451
terms are used in division (D)(1) of section 4503.06 of the 452
Revised Code, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e)(B)(3) of this 453
section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(d)(ii) to 454
(iv) of this section. 455
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 456

S. B. No. 215 Page 18
As Introduced
4503.0610 of the Revised Code or division (A) or (B) of this 457
section. The reduction applies to only one manufactured or 458
mobile home owned and occupied by such a surviving spouse. A 459
manufactured or mobile home qualifies for a reduction in taxes 460
under this division for the tax year in which the public service 461
officer dies through the tax year in which the surviving spouse 462
dies or remarries. 463
(D) If the owner or the spouse of the owner of a 464
manufactured or mobile home is eligible for a homestead 465
exemption on the land upon which the home is located, the 466
reduction to which the owner or spouse is entitled under this 467
section shall not exceed the difference between the reduction to 468
which the owner or spouse is entitled under division (A), (B), 469
or (C) of this section and the amount of the reduction under the 470
homestead exemption. 471
(E) No reduction shall be made with respect to the home of 472
any person convicted of violating division (C) or (D) of section 473
4503.066 of the Revised Code for a period of three years 474
following the conviction. 475
Section 2. That existing sections 323.152 and 4503.065 of 476
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 477
Section 3. The amendment by this act of sections 323.152 478
and 4503.065 of the Revised Code applies, in the case of 479
property on the real property tax list, to tax years ending on 480
or after the effective date of this section and, in the case of 481
property on the manufactured home tax list, to tax years 482
beginning on or after the effective date of this section. 483
Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle 484
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 485

S. B. No. 215 Page 19
As Introduced
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 486
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 487
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 488
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 489
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 490
as presented in this act: 491
Section 323.152 of the Revised Code as amended by both 492
H.B. 33 and S.B. 43 of the 135th General Assembly. 493
Section 4503.065 of the Revised Code as amended by both 494
H.B. 33 and S.B. 43 of the 135th General Assembly. 495